test/src/morphology/pp-roots_gt-norm.yaml
# yaml test generated from src/morphology/stems/pp.lexc with doccomments2yaml.awk
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst

Tests:
  ADP: #
    alta+Po: alta # 
    alle+Po+PxPl3: alleen # 
    irti+Po: irti # 
    irti+Po+Qst: irtikö # 
